Utah statutes.
62A-5-106.   Powers of other state agencies -- Severability.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to supersede or limit the authority granted by law to any other state agency.  If any provision of this part, or the application of any provision to the person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this part shall not be affected.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

